Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.21
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; sales or exchanges; restriction or avoidance; exception.

Nothing in the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers or beneficial substances to each other by importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix commercial fertilizers or beneficial substances for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipments of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances to manufacturers or manipulators who have met the provisions of the act.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 21, p. 1046;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 21;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 39;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 28.
March 17, 2026